en: No added sodium
xx: No added sodium

en: Low or no salt
ca: Baix o sense sal
de: Mit wenig oder keinem Salz
es: Bajo en sal o sin sal, Bajo o sin sal
fi: vähäsuolainen tai suolaton, vähän suolaa tai suolaton
fr: Peu ou pas de sel, peu ou pas salé
he: דל או נטול מלח
hr: malo ili bez soli
hu: Alacsony sótartalmú vagy sótlan
it: Con poco sale o senza sale
nl: Geen of weinig zout, Laag in zout
pt: Baixo ou sem sal, baixo teor ou sem sal
th: เกลือต่ำหรือไม่มีเลย

en: Low salt
xx: low salt
ca: Baix en sal
de: Salzarm
es: Bajo en sal
fi: vähäsuolainen, matalasuolainen, vähän suolaa
fr: Peu de sel, peu salé, faible teneur en sel, pauvre en sel, très pauvre en sel
he: דל במלח
hr: bez dodane soli
hu: Alacsony sótartalmú
it: Basso contenuto di sale
nl: Weinig zout
pt: Baixo teor de sal
ru: Низкое содержание соли
th: สูตรลดเกลือ

en: Reduced salt, Less salt
ca: Reduït en sal, Menys sal
de: Weniger Salz
es: Menos sal
fi: vähemmän suolaa
fr: Allégé en sel, Teneur en sel réduite, teneur réduite en sel, Moins de sel, Moins salé, sel réduit
he: מופחת מלח, פחות מלח
hr: Smanjena količina soli
hu: Csökkentett sótartalmú
it: Ridotto contenuto di sale, ridotto sale, meno sale
nl: Zoutarm
pt: Sal reduzido, menos sal, teor de sal reduzido, teor de sal baixo, teor baixo de sal, teor reduzido de sal
th: ลดเกลือ

en: very low salt
xx: very low salt

en: 10% less salt
bg: 10% по-малко сол
ca: 10% menys de sal
cs: O 10 % méně soli
da: 10% mindre salt
de: 10% weniger Salz
el: 10% λιγότερο αλάτι
es: 10% menos de sal
fi: 10% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 10% de sel, -10% de sel, 10% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 10%
he: 10% פחות מלח
hr: 10% manje soli
hu: 10%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 10% in meno di sale
ja: 塩分10%カット
ko: 소금 10% 저감
nl: 10% minder zout
pl: 10% mniej soli
pt: 10% menos sal, -10% menos sal, menos 10% sal, 10% menos de sal, -10% menos de sal, menos 10% de sal
ru: На 10% меньше соли
sv: 10% mindre salt
th: ลดปริมาณเกลือลง 10%
zh: 减少10%的盐

en: 15% less salt
bg: 15% по-малко сол
ca: 15% menys de sal
cs: O 15 % méně soli
da: 15% mindre salt
de: 15% weniger Salz
el: 15% λιγότερο αλάτι
es: 15% menos de sal
fi: 15% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 15% de sel, -15% de sel, 15% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 15%
he: 15% פחות מלח
hr: 15% manje soli
hu: 15%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 15% in meno di sale
ja: 塩分15%カット
ko: 소금 15% 저감
nl: 15% minder zout
pl: 15% mniej soli
pt: 15% menos sal, -15% menos sal, menos 15% sal, 15% menos de sal, -15% menos de sal, menos 15% de sal
ru: На 15% меньше соли
sv: 15% mindre salt
th: ลดปริมาณเกลือลง 15%
zh: 减少15%的盐

en: 20% less salt
bg: 20% по-малко сол
da: 20% mindre salt
de: 20% weniger Salz
es: 20% menos de sal
fi: 20% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 20% de sel, -20% de sel, 20% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 20%
hu: 20%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 20% in meno di sale
nl: 20% minder zout
pt: 20% menos sal, -20% menos sal, menos 20% sal, 20% menos de sal, -20% menos de sal, menos 20% de sal

en: 25% less salt
bg: 25% по-малко сол
ca: 25% menys de sal
da: 25% mindre salt
de: 25% weniger Salz
es: 25% menos de sal
fi: 25% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 25% de sel, -25% de sel, 25% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 25%
hr: -25% soli
hu: 25%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 25% in meno di sale
nl: 25% minder zout
pl: 25% mniej soli
pt: 25% menos sal, -25% menos sal, menos 25% sal, 25% menos de sal, -25% menos de sal, menos 25% de sal
th: ใช้เกลือลดลง 25%

en: 30% less salt
bg: 30% по-малко сол
da: 30% mindre salt
de: 30% weniger Salz
es: 30% menos de sal
fi: 30% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 30% de sel, -30% de sel, 30% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 30%
he: 30% פחות מלח
hu: 30%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 30% in meno di sale
nl: 30% minder zout
pt: 30% menos sal, -30% menos sal, menos 30% sal, 30% menos de sal, -30% menos de sal, menos 30% de sal

en: 35% less salt
bg: 35% по-малко сол
da: 35% mindre salt
de: 35% weniger Salz
es: 35% menos de sal
fi: 35% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 35% de sel, -35% de sel, 35% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 35%
he: 35% פחות מלח
hu: 35%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 35% in meno di sale
nl: 35% minder zout
pt: 35% menos sal, -35% menos sal, menos 35% sal, 35% menos de sal, -35% menos de sal, menos 35% de sal

en: 40% less salt
bg: 40% по-малко сол
da: 40% mindre salt
de: 40% weniger Salz
es: 40% menos de sal
fi: 40% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 40% de sel, -40% de sel, 40% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 40%
hu: 40%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 40% in meno di sale
nl: 40% minder zout
pt: 40% menos sal, -40% menos sal, menos 40% sal, 40% menos de sal, -40% menos de sal, menos 40% de sal

en: 45% less salt
bg: 45% по-малко сол
da: 45% mindre salt
de: 45% weniger Salz
es: 45% menos de sal
fi: 45% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 45% de sel, -45% de sel, 45% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 45%
hu: 45%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 45% in meno di sale
nl: 45% minder zout
pt: 45% menos sal, -45% menos sal, menos 45% sal, 45% menos de sal, -45% menos de sal, menos 45% de sal

en: 50% less salt
bg: 50% по-малко сол
da: 50% mindre salt
de: 50% weniger Salz
es: 50% menos de sal
fi: 50% vähemmän suolaa
fr: Moins 50% de sel, -50% de sel, 50% de sel en moins, Sel réduit de 50%
hu: 50%-al csökkentett sótartalmú
it: 50% in meno di sale
nl: 50% minder zout
pt: 50% menos sal, -50% menos sal, menos 50% sal, 50% menos de sal, -50% menos de sal, menos 50% de sal

en: No added salt
xx: No added salt
bg: Без добавена сол
ca: Sense sal afegida
de: Ohne Salzzusatz
es: Sin sal añadida, 0% sal añadida
fi: ei lisättyä suolaa, ilman lisättyä suolaa
fr: Sans sel ajouté, sans sel ajoutés, sans ajout de sel
he: ללא תוספת מלח
hu: Hozzáadott só nélkül, hozzáadott sót nem tartalmaz, nincs hozzáadott só
it: Senza sale aggiunto, Senza aggiunte di sale, Senza aggiunta di sale
nl: Zonder toegevoegd zout, Geen zout toegevoegd, 0% zout toegevoegd
pl: Bez dodatku soli, Bez soli
pt: Sem sal adicionado, sem adição de sal
ru: Без добавления соли
th: ไม่เติมเกลือ

en: No salt, salt-free
xx: no salt
bg: Без сол
ca: Sense sal
de: ohne Salz, salzfrei, 0% Salz
es: Sin sal
fi: suolaton, ei suolaa, 0% suolaa
fr: Sans sel
he: נטול מלח, ללא מלח
hr: bez soli
hu: Sómentes, sótlan, Sózatlan, só nélkül
it: Senza sale
nl: Zoutloos, Zonder zout, Zoutvrij
pt: Sem sal
ru: Без соли, 0% соли
th: ไม่มีเกลือ

en: High in sugars
es: Alto en azúcares

en: Low or no sugar
ca: Sense o baix en sucre
cs: Nízký nebo žádný obsah cukru
de: zuckerarm oder zuckerfrei
es: Bajo o sin azúcar
fi: vähäsokerinen tai sokeriton, vähän sokeria tai sokeriton
fr: Peu ou pas de sucre, peu ou pas sucré
he: דל או ללא סוכר
hr: malo ili bez šećera
hu: Cukormentes vagy alacsony cukortartalmú
it: Zucchero basso o assente
nl: Zonder of weinig suiker
pl: O małej zawartości cukru lub bez cukru
pt: Baixo ou nenhum açúcar
ru: Низкое содержание сахара или без сахара
sv: Lågt eller inget socker
th: น้ำตาลต่ำ
zh: 低糖或无糖

en: Low sugar, Low in sugars
xx: low sugar
ca: Baix en sucre
de: Wenig Zucker
es: Bajo contenido de azúcar
fi: vähäsokerinen, vähän sokeria
fr: Peu de sucre, peu sucré, faible teneur en sucre
he: דל סוכר
hr: nisko u šećeru
hu: Alacsony cukortartalmú
it: Basso contenuto di zucchero
nl: Weinig suiker
pl: Niska zawartość cukru, Mała zawartość cukru
pt: Pouco açúcar
ru: Низкое содержание сахара
sv: Låg sockerhalt
th: น้ำตาลต่ำหรือไม่มีเลย

en: Reduced sugar, Less sugar
ca: Reduït en sucre, Menys sucre
de: Zuckerreduziert, Weniger Zucker
es: Menos azúcar, Azúcar reducido, Contenido de azúcar reducido
fi: Vähemmän sokeria
fr: Allégé en sucre, Allégé en sucres, Allégés en sucre, Allégés en suces, Allégées en sucre, Allégées en sucres, Allégée en sucre, Allégée en sucres, Teneur en sucre réduite, teneur réduite en sucre, Moins de sucre, Moins sucré, Sucre réduit
he: מופחת סוכר, פחות סוכר
hr: manje šećera, smanjena količina šećera
hu: Csökkentett cukortartalmú
it: Ridotto contenuto di zucchero
nl: Minder suiker
pl: O obniżonej zawartości cukru, Obniżona zawartość cukru
pt: Açúcar reduzido, menos açúcar
th: น้ำตาลน้อย